Mississippi, session 2026, HB105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) The Legislature finds that: (a)  Higher education credentials are: (i)  Becoming increasingly important for the State of Mississippi to maintain a competitive workforce; and (ii)  Critical for adults to qualify and obtain high-wage employment; and (b)  It is in the public interest that: (i)  Individuals improve their education credentials in order to qualify for higher-wage jobs; (ii)  Eligible persons have access to postsecondary education programs that meet the specific needs of working adults; (iii)  Institutions of higher education offer programs targeted to the specific workforce needs of their area within the state; and (iv)  Our state provides services aimed at improving employment prospects for low-income adults. (2)  (a)  (i)  The Mississippi Department of Employment Security, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the Mississippi Community College Board and the State Workforce Investment Board shall work jointly to develop a plan to be known as the "Career Pathways Initiative." (ii)  The plan must be updated annually. (b)  The initiative must: (i)  Increase the access of low-income parents and other individuals to education credentials that qualify them for higher-paying jobs in their local areas; (ii)  Improve the preparedness of the Mississippi workforce for high-skill and high-wage jobs; (iii)  Develop training courses and educational credentials after consulting local employers and local workforce boards to identify appropriate job opportunities and needed skills and training to meet employers' needs; (iv)  Provide resources on the basis of performance incentives, including participants: 1.  Enrolling in courses; 2.  Completing the courses; 3.  Obtaining jobs in the targeted job categories; and 4.  Staying employed in the targeted job categories; and (v)  Use available Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds for participants who have custody or legal responsibility for a child under twenty-one (21) years of age and whose family income is less than two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty level. (3)  The initiative plan is subject to review, recommendation and approval by the State Workforce Investment Board. (4)  Under the initiative, the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall contract to provide education and training that will result in job training certificates or higher education degrees for low-income adults with: (a)  State agencies; (b)  Two-year colleges; (c)  Local governments; or (d)  Private or community organizations. (5)  (a)  The initiative plan must specify procedures and requirements for applications for entry into programs under subsection (4) of this section. (b)  Applications must be made to the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. (6)  The Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning shall determine which two-year college proposals are funded under the initiative. (7)  Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds may be combined with other federal, state and local funds in ways consistent with federal laws and regulations in order to provide more funding for the provisions of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.